Utah statutes.
17-50-313.   Provisions for general health -- Creation of health department.

Each county shall:

(1)  make provisions for the preservation of health in the county and pay the related expenses; and

(2) create a local health department as provided in Title 26A, Chapter 1, Part 1, Local Health Department Act.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2002 General Session

